District of Columbia statutes.
26-214

Foreclosure of advanced shareholder’s security.

In case any advanced shareholder shall fail to pay all dues, interest, or premiums and shall be in arrears for any part of the same for the period of 2 months, the payment of the same and of the principal of the advance may be enforced by a foreclosure of the securities given for the same, and if upon a statement of account, as in case of a voluntary settlement of said advance, as hereinbefore authorized, there shall be any surplus of the proceeds of sale of the property given as security over the amount found due from such advanced shareholder, together with all costs incurred by the corporation, such surplus shall be paid to said defaulting shareholder, or his assigns, and his shares of stock so advanced upon shall be the property of the corporation.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1300, ch. 854, § 699

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 26-514.
1973 Ed., § 26-413.